Hawaii statutes.
§449-14 Fees. (a) The following fees
shall be paid by licensed escrow depositories to the commissioner and, together
with any administrative penalty or other charge assessed under this chapter,
shall be deposited into the compliance resolution fund established pursuant to
section 26‑9(o):

(1) For filing and investigation of an escrow
depository's application for license, $5,000;

(2) For initial issuance of an escrow depository
license, $2,000;

(3) For an application for approval to establish a
branch office, $100;

(4) For an application for approval to relocate an
existing office or branch, $100;

(5) For annual renewal of an escrow depository's
license, $2,000;

(6) For initial issuance and annual renewal of a
branch office license, $100;

(7) For reissuance of a license for the change in the
business address of its office, $50; provided that a
reissuance caused by changes to the address by the United States Postal Service
shall not require payment of a fee;

(8) For reissuance of a license for a change in the
licensee's name, $50;

(9) For an application for a proposed change in
control of the licensee, $5,000; and

(10) For an application for approval to cease business
as an escrow depository, $0.

(b) For all escrow depositories examined by
the commissioner or the commissioner′s staff, the commissioner:

(1) May charge an examination fee based upon the cost
per hour per examiner. The hourly fee shall be $60;

(2) May charge additional amounts for travel, per
diem, mileage, and other reasonable expenses incurred in connection with the
examination; and

(3) Shall bill the affected escrow depository for
examination fees and expenses as soon as feasible after the close of the
examination or investigation. The affected escrow depository shall pay the
division within thirty days following the billing. All payments shall be
deposited into the compliance resolution fund established pursuant to section
26‑9(o). Any dispute by the affected escrow depository relating to these
billings shall be reviewed by the commissioner who may modify, waive, or
suspend any billing.

(c) An escrow depository that fails to make a
payment required by this section shall be subject to an administrative penalty
of not more than $200 per day for each day it is in violation of this section.

(d) Any fee authorized by this section may be
set or modified by the commissioner by rule adopted pursuant to chapter 91. [L
1967, c 144, pt of §1; HRS §449-14; am L 1973, c 141, §1; am L 1979, c 219, §4;
am L 1985, c 269, §50; am L 1992, c 205, §13; am L 1996, c 41, §3; am L 1999, c
129, §18; am L 2001, c 184, §4; am L 2013, c 166, §9; am L 2016, c 224, §6]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next